Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2293.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1723-A(d)(1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1723-A. Enrollment.--* * *(d) (1) Enrollment of students in a charter school or cyber charter school shall not be subject to a cap or otherwise limited by any past or future action of a board of school directors, a board of control established under Article XVII-B, a special board of control established under section 692 or any other governing authority.[, unless agreed to by the charter school or cyber charter school as part of a written charter pursuant to section 1720-A.] For the purposes of this paragraph, 1234567891011121314151617181920 the term "governing authority" shall include, but not be limited to, the department.* * *Section 2. A cap or limitation of enrollment under section 1723-A(d)(1) of the act that is in place on the effective date of this section shall be deemed to be void.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2293PN3007 - 2 - 1234567